seg/mar.2.dix
    <!-- negation bb -->
    <pardef n="__neg">
      <e r="LR">  <p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>त</l><r>त<s n="adv"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>त</l><r>त<s n="adv"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>त</l><r>त<s n="adv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>     <p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>स</l><r>स<s n="adv"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>


  </pardefs>

    <e lm="नाही">             <i>नाही</i><par n="__neg"/></e>
